Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 76 O.S. 2021, Section 18, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 18. An A. For causes of action arising before November
1, 2026, an action for damages for injury or death against any
physician, health care provider, or hospital licensed under the laws
of this state, whether based in tort, breach of contract, or
otherwise, arising out of patient care, shall be brought within two
(2) years of the date the plaintiff knew or should have known,
through the exercise of reasonable diligence, of the existence of
the death, injury, or condition complained of; provided, however,
the minority or incompetency when the cause of action arises will
extend said period of limitation.
Req. No. 15831 Page 1

B. For causes of action arising on or after November 1, 2026,
an action for damages for injury or death against any physician,
health care provider, or hospital licensed under the laws of this
state, whether based in tort, breach of contract, or otherwise,
arising out of patient care, shall be brought within three (3) years
of the date the plaintiff knew or should have known, through the
exercise of reasonable diligence, of the existence of the death,
injury, or condition complained of; provided, however, the minority
or incompetency when the cause of action arises will extend said
period of limitation.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15831 AQH 12/09/25











Req. No. 15831 Page 2